California statutes. Financial Code
Upon the filing of the application for a certificate to act as a credit union, the commissioner shall examine the application together with the other papers and documents filed therewith. The commissioner may make any further investigation of the applicant and its affairs that he deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.

If the commissioner determines that the applicant has satisfied the provisions of this division and does not find facts constituting reasons for denial as specified in Section 14155, the commissioner shall issue and deliver a certificate to the applicant to engage in business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 974, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14155.

Upon reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may deny the application for a certificate to act as a credit union or an expansion of the field of membership of an existing credit union for any of the following reasons:

(a) The field of membership of the applicant is contrary to the principles of organizing credit unions, including principles of organizing credit unions based on common bond of occupation, association, or groups within a well-defined neighborhood, community
 or rural district.

(b) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application for certificate.

(c) Any officer, director, or committee member of the applicant has, within the last 10 years, been (1) convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime, or (2) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, which crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(d) The applicant or any officer, director, or committee member of the applicant has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or any similar regulatory scheme of a foreign jurisdiction.

(e) The number of persons eligible for membership
 is less than 500.

(f) The applicant’s showing as to the economic feasibility of the proposed credit union is inadequate. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, nothing shall prohibit a credit union from admitting to membership any corporation formed to provide services to credit unions or to credit union members in which the credit union holds shares pursuant to Sections 14650 and 14651 and any limited liability company formed to provide services to credit unions or to credit union members in which the credit union holds membership or economic interests pursuant to Section 14651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14156.

Each certificate issued under this division remains in full force and effect until surrendered and accepted by the commissioner, or until suspended or revoked by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration and Powers of the Commissioner [14200. - 14384.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [14200. - 14212.]

14200.

The powers of supervision and examination of all credit unions organized under the provisions of this division are vested in the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14200.1.

There is in the Division of Financial Institutions of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation the Office of Credit Unions. The Office of Credit Unions has charge of the execution of the laws of this state relating to credit unions or to the credit union business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 115.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14200.2.

The chief officer of the Office of Credit Unions is the Deputy Commissioner of the Office of Credit Unions. The Deputy Commissioner of the Office of Credit Unions, under the direction and on behalf of the Senior Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Division of Financial Institutions, shall administer the laws of this state relating to credit unions or the credit union business. The Deputy Commissioner of the Office of Credit Unions shall be appointed by the Governor and shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The Deputy Commissioner of the Office of Credit Unions shall receive an annual salary as fixed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 116.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14201.

The commissioner may establish or waive such rules and regulations as may be reasonable or necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 263, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14202.

The commissioner may by regulation authorize credit unions organized under the provisions of this division to engage in any activity authorized by law or regulation for credit unions organized under the laws of the United States. Any such regulation shall expire on the first day of January two years following the end of the calendar year in which such regulation was promulgated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 270, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14203.

Upon request of the commissioner, a credit union shall furnish to the commissioner an authorization for examination of financial records of any capital funds, undivided profits, and reserve funds, maintained in a financial institution, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1097, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14204.

If the commissioner upon any examination, or from any report made to the commissioner, finds any credit union is violating the provisions of this division or the rules made pursuant to this division, or has impaired capital, or is insolvent, or is conducting its business in an unsafe or unauthorized manner, the commissioner may notify the credit union to, and the credit union shall, cease these practices. The commissioner may notify the credit union to, and the credit union shall, temporarily suspend or entirely cease the transaction of any new business or
 the portion thereof as is ordered by the commissioner. Within 10 days from the date of a notification or order pursuant to this section, the credit union may request a hearing. Neither the request for a hearing nor the hearing itself shall stay the notification or order issued by the commissioner under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 571.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14205.

The commissioner may, upon reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, suspend or revoke any certificate if the commissioner finds that the credit union has violated any provisions of this division or any rule or regulation of the commissioner made pursuant to this division, or if any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time of the original application for certificate, reasonably would have warranted the commissioner in refusing originally to issue such certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 974, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14207.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14208.

The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order censure, or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar from any position of employment or management of, any credit union, any officer, director, or employee of, or person performing similar functions for, a credit union, if the commissioner finds that:

(1) The censure, suspension or bar is in the public interest, that the person has committed a violation of this division or rule of the commissioner, and that the violation was either willful or caused, or will probably cause, material damage to
 the credit union or any member thereof.

(2) Any officer, director, employee of, or person performing similar functions for a credit union has been convicted of, or pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime, or has been held liable in a civil action by final judgment if the crime or civil action involved fraud, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion or misappropriation of property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14209.

(a) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices constituting a violation of any provision of this division or any rule or order adopted pursuant to this division, the commissioner may in the commissioner’s discretion bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance. Upon a proper showing a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted and a receiver or conservator, which may include the commissioner, may be appointed
 for the defendant or the defendant’s assets, and any other ancillary relief may be granted as appropriate. A receiver or conservator appointed by the court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise all of the powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties, including the powers expressly authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 14300.

(b) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a), a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution or disgorgement or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the court shall have jurisdiction to award the additional relief.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1202, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14211.

In determining for purposes of this division whether the capital of any credit union is adequate, the commissioner shall consider the following:

(a) The nature and volume of the business and the proposed business of the credit union.

(b) The amount, nature, quality, and liquidity of the assets of the credit union.

(c) The amount and nature of the liabilities, including
 contingent liabilities, of the credit union.

(d) The history of, and prospects for, the credit union to earn and retain income.

(e) The nature and scope of the operations of the credit union.

(f) The performance of the management of the credit union.

(g) Any other factors as are, in the opinion of the commissioner, relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 15.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14212.

(a) The commissioner, whenever in his or her opinion such action is necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her duties, may call a meeting of the board of directors of a credit union.

(b) A meeting of the board of a credit union called by the commissioner shall be held upon four days’ notice by first class mail or 24 hours’ notice delivered personally or by telephone. The notice shall be given
 by the commissioner or, if the commissioner so orders, by an officer of the credit union.

(c) A meeting of the board of a credit union called by the commissioner shall be held at the head office of the credit union, the department office closest to the head office of the credit union, or any other place within a reasonable distance to the head office of the credit union as may be designated by the commissioner and specified in the notice of that meeting.

(d) The expenses of the credit union pertaining to a meeting of the board of a credit union called by the commissioner shall be paid by the credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 532, Sec. 46.   (AB 1268)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Examinations and Reports [14250. - 14257.]

14250.

(a) (1) The commissioner may at any time investigate into the affairs and examine the books, accounts, records, files, and any office within or outside of this state used in the business of every credit union, whether it acts or claims to act under or without authority of this division.

(2) The commissioner and the commissioner’s duly designated representatives shall have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of a credit union referred to in paragraph (1).

(3) The officers and employees of a credit union being examined shall exhibit to the
 examiners, on request, any or all of its securities, books, records, and accounts and shall otherwise cooperate with the examination so far as it is in their power.

(b) (1) The commissioner shall examine every credit union organized under the laws of this state to the extent and whenever and as often as the commissioner shall deem it advisable but in no case less than once every two years.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an examination made by the commissioner in conjunction with or with assistance from the National Credit Union Administration or a credit union regulatory agency of another state of the United States is deemed to be an examination made by the commissioner.

(3) For purposes of
 this subdivision, an examination made by the National Credit Union Administration pursuant to an alternating examination schedule approved by both the commissioner and the National Credit Union Administration is deemed to be an examination made by the commissioner.

(4) This subdivision does not require the commissioner to make an examination onsite at the offices of a credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 762, Sec. 1.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14251.

The commissioner upon the written consent of any credit union officer or director may make any examination of the credit union in any regularly established office of the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14252.

(a) A credit union with total assets equal to or greater than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall, within 105 days after the end of each fiscal year or within any extended time that the commissioner may specify, file with the commissioner an audit report for the fiscal year.

(b) The audit report called for in subdivision (a) shall comply with all of the following provisions:

(1) The audit report shall contain the audited financial statements of the credit union for, or as of the end of, the fiscal year, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles that the
 commissioner may specify, and any other information that the commissioner may specify.

(2) The audit report shall be based upon an audit of the credit union, conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, and any other requirements that the commissioner may specify.

(3) The audit report shall be prepared by an independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant who is acceptable to the commissioner.

(4) The audit report shall include, or be accompanied by, a certificate or opinion of the independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant that is satisfactory in form and content to the commissioner. If the certificate or opinion is qualified, the
 commissioner may order the credit union to take any action that the commissioner may find necessary or advisable to enable the independent certified public accountant or independent
 public accountant to remove the qualification.

(c) A credit union with total assets of less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall, within 105 days after the end of each fiscal year or within any extended time that the commissioner may specify, file with the commissioner an audit report for the fiscal year.

(d) The audit report called for in subdivision (c) may comply with all the provisions of subdivision (b), or may consist of alternative procedures acceptable to the commissioner. An alternative procedures audit may be performed by any of the following:

(1) An independent certified public accountant.

(2) An independent public
 accountant.

(3) The credit union’s supervisory or audit committee, as applicable, provided that the audit complies with the requirements of Section 14253.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the commissioner may reject an alternative procedures audit that he or she determines is not satisfactory. If the commissioner rejects an alternative procedures audit for any reason, he or she may order a credit union to obtain an audit that is satisfactory to the commissioner.

(f) The commissioner may, by order or regulation, either unconditionally or upon specified terms and conditions, grant an exemption from this section in any case where the commissioner finds that the requirements of this section are not necessary or advisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 353, Sec. 2.   (AB 2274)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14253.

A credit union shall, when requested by the commissioner, submit its unaudited financial statements, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and consisting of at least a balance sheet and statement of income as of the date and for the period specified by the commissioner. The commissioner may require the submission of such reports on a monthly or other periodic basis.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14254.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), within 10 business days of opening, closing, or relocating a branch office, a credit union shall notify the commissioner in writing of the action, including the street and mailing addresses of the branch office.

(b) A credit union shall not establish a branch office in another state of the United States without the approval of the governmental authority with jurisdiction to license or charter credit unions in that state. “State” has the meaning set forth in Section 207.

(c) A credit union shall not establish a branch office in a foreign nation without the prior written approval of the commissioner. “Foreign nation” has the meaning set forth in Section 175.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 15.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14255.

Every credit union shall make other special reports to the commissioner as the commissioner may from time to time require. Such reports shall be in the form and filed at such date as prescribed by the commissioner, and shall if required by him, be verified in such manner as he prescribes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14256.

(a) If any credit union fails to file with the commissioner any report required by this division on or before the day designated for the filing of the report or, if the time for filing the report is extended by the commissioner, within the extended time, or fails to include in the report any matter required by the commissioner, the failure is grounds for the suspension or revocation of the certificate authorizing the credit union to act as a credit union.

(b) If any credit union fails to file with the commissioner any report required by this division or by any order or regulation of the commissioner, on or before the day designated for the filing of the report or, if the time for filing the report is extended by the
 commissioner, within the extended time, or fails to include in the report any matter required by the commissioner, the commissioner may order the credit union to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty imposed pursuant to Section 329.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 16.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14257.

Investigation and examination reports prepared by the commissioner’s duly designated representatives shall not be public records. The reports may be disclosed to the officers, directors, members of the supervisory committee, members of the credit committee, and key management personnel of the credit union that is the subject of a report for the purpose of corrective action by those persons. The examination report may also be disclosed to internal and external auditors and attorneys that are retained by the subject credit union, but only to the extent necessary for the auditors and attorneys to perform work related to issues addressed in the examination report. The disclosure shall not operate as a waiver of the exemption
 specified in Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 109.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.  Enforcement [14300. - 14319.]

14300.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Officer with a subject institution” means the position of director, officer, or employee with the subject institution.

(b) “Subject institution” means any of the following:

(1) A California credit union.

(2) A
 subsidiary of a California credit union.

(3) A foreign, whether other state or other nation, credit union, other than a federal credit union, that maintains an office in this state, with respect to the office.

(4) Any other person, other than a federal credit union, conducting business in this state.

(c) “Subject person,” when used with respect to a subject institution, means any of the following:

(1) A director, officer, employee, or agent of the subject institution.

(2) A member, consultant, joint venture partner, or other person that participates in the affairs of a subject institution.

(3) An independent contractor,
 including an appraiser or accountant, who knowingly or recklessly participates in any of the following acts if the act caused or is likely to cause a material financial loss to, or a significant adverse effect on, the subject institution.

(A) A violation of any applicable law, regulation, or order.

(B) A breach of fiduciary duty.

(C) An unsafe or unsound act.

(d) “Violation” includes any act done alone or with other persons for or toward causing, bringing about, participating in, counseling, aiding, or abetting a violation of any applicable statute, regulation, provision of a written order issued by the commissioner, or provision of a written operating agreement signed by the commissioner and a subject institution or subject person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 18.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.

Any requirement in this chapter for notice or hearing before the commissioner issues an order may be waived by the person to whom the order is issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 20.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14302.

(a) The commissioner may bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court to enjoin any violation of, to enforce compliance with, or to collect any penalty or other liability imposed under, this division or any regulation or order issued under this division. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted, and a monitor, receiver, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court may be appointed for the defendant or the
 defendant’s assets, or other relief may be granted as appropriate.

(b) A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary officer of the court appointed by the court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise all powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, partners, trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties. No action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party against the commissioner, or a receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court by reason of their exercising these powers or performing these duties pursuant to the order of, or with the approval of, the court.

(c) If the commissioner finds that it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in an action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief, including a claim for
 restitution, disgorgement, or damages on behalf of the person injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the court shall have jurisdiction to award ancillary relief.

(d) Neither the provision of subdivision (a) that authorizes the appointment of a monitor, receiver, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court, nor any provision of subdivision (b) or (c), applies to any of the following:

(1) A California credit union that is authorized by the commissioner to transact credit union business.

(2) A foreign, whether other state or other nation, credit union that maintains an office in this state in accordance with federal law, the law of this state, and the law of the credit union’s domicile.

(e) The provisions of this section that authorize the commissioner to bring actions and seek relief are not intended to, and do not, affect any right that another person may have to bring the same or similar actions or to seek the same or similar relief.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 22.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.

(a) The commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, order a person to cease and desist from violating Section 14150 if either of the following criteria are met:

(1) The commissioner finds that the person has violated Section 14150.

(2) The commissioner finds that there is reasonable cause to believe that the person will imminently violate Section 14150.

(b) (1) (A) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), the person to whom the order is issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order.

(B) If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner, or within any longer period to which the person consents, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(C) Within 30 days after the hearing, or within any longer period to which the person consents, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. If the commissioner fails to affirm, modify, or rescind the order within this time limit, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(2) The right of a
 person to whom an order is issued under subdivision (a) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 24.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14304.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds any of the factors set forth in subdivision (a) or (b) with respect to a subject institution or subject person, the commissioner may order the subject institution or subject person to cease and desist from the action or violation:

(a) That the subject institution or subject person has engaged or participated, is engaging or participating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that the subject institution or subject person will imminently
 engage or participate in any unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of the subject institution.

(b) That the subject institution or subject person has violated, is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that the subject institution or subject person will imminently violate, any provision of this division, of any regulation or order issued under this division, of any other applicable law, or of any written agreement with the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 26.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14305.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 14304 is true with respect to a subject institution or subject person and that the action or violation is likely to have any of the consequences set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, order the subject institution or subject person to cease and desist from the action or violation:

(1) To cause the insolvency of the subject
 institution.

(2) To cause significant dissipation of the assets or earnings of the subject institution.

(3) To weaken the condition of the subject institution.

(4) To otherwise prejudice the interests of the members of the subject institution.

(b) (1) (A) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), any subject institution or subject person to whom the order is issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order.

(B) If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner, or within any longer period to which the subject
 institution or subject person consents, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(C) Within 30 days after the hearing, or within any longer period to which the subject institution or subject person consents, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. If the commissioner fails to affirm, modify, or rescind the order within this time limit, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(2) The right of any subject institution or subject person to whom an order is issued under subdivision (a) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the subject institution or subject person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 27.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14306.

An order issued pursuant to Sections 14303 to 14305, inclusive, may include any of the following provisions:

(a) Require the subject institution or subject person to take affirmative action to correct any condition resulting from the action or violation, including any of the following actions:

(1) To make restitution or provide reimbursement, indemnification, or guarantee against loss, if the subject institution or subject person was
 unjustly enriched in connection with the action or violation or if the action or violation involved a reckless disregard for any provision of this division, any regulation or order issued under this division, any other applicable law, or any agreement with the commissioner.

(2) Restrict the growth of the subject institution.

(3) Dispose of any loan or other asset involved.

(4) Correct violations of law.

(5) Employ qualified officers or employees, who may be subject to approval of the commissioner.

(6) Take any other action that the commissioner may find to be necessary or advisable.

(b) Limit the business activities or
 functions of the subject institution or subject person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 28.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14307.

(a) If the commissioner finds that a subject institution’s books or records are so incomplete or inaccurate that the commissioner is unable through the normal supervisory process to determine the financial condition of the subject institution or of the details or purpose of any transaction or transactions that may materially affect the financial condition of the subject institution, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, order the subject institution to do any of the following:

(1) To cease any activity or practice that gave rise, in whole or in part, to the incomplete or inaccurate state of the books or records.

(2) To take affirmative action to restore the books or records to a complete and accurate state.

(b) (1) (A) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), any subject institution or subject person to whom the order is issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order.

(B) If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner, or within any longer period to which the subject institution or subject person consents, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(C) Within 30 days after the hearing, or within any longer period to which the subject institution or subject person consents, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. If the commissioner fails to affirm, modify, or rescind the order within this time limit, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(2) The right of any subject institution or subject person to whom an order is issued under subdivision (a) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the subject institution or subject person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 29.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14308.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in subdivision (a), any of the factors set forth in subdivision (b), and any of the factors set forth in subdivision (c) are true with respect to a subject person of a subject institution, the commissioner may issue an order suspending or removing the subject person from the subject person’s office, if any, with the subject institution and prohibiting the subject person from participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the subject institution without the
 approval of the commissioner:

(a) (1) That the subject person has, directly or indirectly, violated any provision of this division, of any regulation or order issued under this division, of any other applicable law relating to the business of the licensee, or of any written agreement with the commissioner.

(2) That the subject person has, directly or indirectly, engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound act in connection with the business of the subject institution or any other business institution.

(3) That the subject person has, directly or indirectly, engaged or participated in any act which constitutes a breach of the subject person’s fiduciary duty.

(b) That, by reason of the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty
 described in subdivision (a) the following have occurred:

(1) The subject institution or business institution has suffered or will probably suffer financial loss or other damage.

(2) The interests of the members of the subject institution have been or could be prejudiced.

(3) The subject person has received financial gain or other benefit.

(c) That the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty described in subdivision (a) either involves dishonesty on the part of the subject person or demonstrates the subject person’s willful or continuing disregard for the safety or soundness of the subject institution or business institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 30.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14309.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 14308, any of the factors set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14308, and any of the factors set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 14308 are true with respect to a subject person of a subject institution, and that an action is necessary or advisable for the protection of the subject institution or the interests of the members of the subject institution, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, issue an order that does both of
 the following:

(1) Suspends the subject person from the subject person’s office, if any, with the subject institution.

(2) Prohibits the subject person from participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the subject institution without the approval of the commissioner.

(b) (1) (A) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), any subject person to whom the order is issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order.

(B) If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner or within any longer period to which the subject person consents, the order shall be deemed
 rescinded.

(C) Within 30 days after the hearing or within any longer period to which the subject person consents, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. If the commissioner fails to affirm, modify, or rescind the order within this time limit, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(2) The right of any subject person to whom an order is issued under subdivision (a) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the subject person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 31.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14310.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in paragraph (1) and the factor set forth in paragraph (2) are true with respect to a subject person or former subject person of a subject institution, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, issue an order suspending the subject person or former subject person from his or her office, if any, with the subject institution and prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the subject institution without the
 approval of the commissioner:

(1) That the subject person or former subject person has been charged in an indictment issued by a grand jury or in an information, complaint, or similar pleading issued by a United States attorney, district attorney, or other governmental official or agency authorized to prosecute crimes, with commission of or participation in any of the following crimes:

(A) A crime that involves dishonesty or breach of trust and that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year.

(B) A criminal violation of any provision of this division.

(C) A criminal violation of Section 1956, 1957, or 1960 of Title 18 of, or Section 5322 or 5324 of Title 31 of, the United States Code.

(D) A criminal violation of a law of any jurisdiction other than the United States that is substantially similar to any of the statutes specified in subparagraph (C).
